Maine, session 132, LD1211.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§1-B, as amended by PL 2011, c. 644, §9 and
affected by §33, is further amended to read:
1-B. Automobile. "Automobile" means a self-propelled 4-wheel motor vehicle
designed primarily to carry passengers and not designed to run on tracks. "Automobile"
includes a pickup truck or van with a gross vehicle weight rating of 10,000 pounds or less
that is not used primarily to transport goods or freight.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§5-D, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. H, §2
and affected by §29 and enacted by c. 673, §2 and affected by §28, is amended to read:
C. Providing tangible personal property along with a person to operate that property,
for a fixed or indeterminate period of time, when that person is necessary for the
tangible personal property to perform as designed and the person does more than
maintain, inspect or set up the tangible personal property; or
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§5-D, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. H, §2
and affected by §29 and enacted by c. 673, §2 and affected by §28, is amended to read:
D. The lease or rental of property that is subject to the provisions of the service
provider tax imposed pursuant to chapter 358.; or
Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§5-D, ¶E is enacted to read:
E. The lease or rental of tangible personal property that is used only at the primary
business location of the lessor.